Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-258
Waiver of notice.

(MBCA 7.06) (a) A shareholder may waive any
notice required by the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, the articles
of incorporation, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the
notice. The waiver must be in writing, be signed by the shareholder entitled
to the notice, and be delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes
or filing with the corporate records.

(b) A shareholder's attendance
at a meeting:

(1)
Waives objection to lack of notice or defective notice of the meeting, unless
the shareholder at the beginning of the meeting objects to holding the meeting
or transacting business at the meeting; and

(2) Waives objection to consideration of a particular
matter at the meeting that is not within the purpose or purposes described
in the meeting notice, unless the shareholder objects to considering the matter
when it is presented.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 58.